California statutes. Penal Code
Funds may be borrowed from private sources, upon those terms that the Department of Finance deems appropriate, including but not limited to, the use of equipment under the jurisdiction of the authority, and of the future income of an enterprise under the jurisdiction of the authority, as collateral to secure any loan.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 24.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2810.5.

Notwithstanding any other law, commencing July 1, 2005, the Pooled Money Investment Board, or its successor, may grant loans to the authority when money is appropriated for that purpose by the Legislature, upon application by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, in order to finance the establishment of a new industrial, agricultural, or service enterprise. All loans shall bear the same interest rate as the pooled money market investment rate and shall have a maximum repayment period of 20 years from the date of approval of the loan.

Prior to making its decision to grant a loan, the Pooled Money Investment Board, or its successor, shall require the authority to demonstrate all of the
 following:

(a) The proposed industry project cannot be feasibly financed from private sources under Section 2810. The authority shall present proposed loan conditions from at least two private sources.

(b) The proposed industry project cannot feasibly be financed from proceeds from other California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Authority enterprises.

(c) The proceeds from the proposed project provide for a reasonable payback schedule to the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 42.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2811.

(a) Commencing July 1, 2005, the director shall adopt and maintain a compensation schedule for inmate employees. That compensation schedule shall be based on quantity and quality of work performed and shall be required for its performance, but in no event shall that compensation exceed one-half the minimum wage provided in Section 1182 of the Labor Code, except as otherwise provided in this code. This compensation shall be credited to the account of the inmate.

(b) Inmate compensation shall be paid from the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 43.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2812.

It is unlawful for any person to sell, expose for sale, or offer for sale within this state, any article or articles manufactured wholly or in part by convict or other prison labor, except articles the sale of which is specifically sanctioned by law.

Every person selling, exposing for sale, or offering for sale any article manufactured in this state wholly or in part by convict or other prison labor, the sale of which is not specifically sanctioned by law, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.

The director may provide for the manufacture of small articles of handiwork by the prisoners out of raw materials purchased by the prisoners with their own funds or funds borrowed from the Inmates’ Welfare Fund, or from raw materials furnished by the director without compensation therefor as provided in this section which articles may be sold to the public at the state prisons, in public buildings, at fairs, or on property operated by nonprofit associations. State-owned property shall not be given to prisoners for use under this section, unless all proceeds from the sale thereof shall be deposited in the Inmates’ Welfare Fund. The director may provide that all or a part of the sale price of all other articles manufactured and sold under this section be deposited to the account of the prisoner manufacturing the article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1982, Ch. 1549, Sec. 28.)
-------------------------------------------

2813.5.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this chapter except subdivision (i) of Section 2808, and notwithstanding subdivision (l) of Section 22851.3 of the Vehicle Code, the Director of Corrections may provide for the inmates in trade and industrial education or vocational training classes established under Section 2054 to restore and rebuild donated salvageable and abandoned vehicles. If these vehicles comply with Section 24007.5 of the Vehicle Code, they may be sold at public auction to private persons. This activity shall be subject to the public hearing requirements of subdivision (i) of Section 2808 at any time that this activity involves a gross annual production of more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000). The proceeds of the sale after deduction of the cost of materials shall be deposited in the Restitution Fund in the State Treasury and, upon appropriation by the Legislature, may be used for indemnification of victims of crimes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1157, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

2814.

Notwithstanding any provision of this chapter, products and byproducts of agricultural and animal husbandry enterprises, except nursery stock, may be sold to private persons, at public or private sale, under rules prescribed by the board.

(History: Added by Stats. 1983, Ch. 1150, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

2815.

Commencing July 1, 2005, the authority may, under rules prescribed by the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation, dispose of products developed from the operations of industrial enterprises in prisons and institutions under the jurisdiction of the authority by sale to foreign governments, corporations for distribution in foreign countries, and private persons or their agents in markets outside the United States and in countries which permit the importation of prison-made goods. All sales made pursuant to this section shall be reported to the Legislature in the general manager’s annual report pursuant to Section 2808.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 10, Sec. 27.   Effective May 10, 2005.   Operative July 1, 2005, by Sec. 99 of Ch. 10.)
-------------------------------------------

2816.

(a) With the approval of the Department of Finance, there shall be transferred to, or deposited in, the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund for purposes authorized by this section, money appropriated from any source including sources other than state appropriations.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (i) of Section 2808, the Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may order any authorized public works project involving the construction, renovation, or repair of prison facilities to be performed by inmate labor or juvenile justice facilities to be performed by ward labor, when the total expenditure does not exceed the project limit
 established by the first paragraph of Section 10108 of the Public Contract Code. Projects entailing expenditure of greater than the project limit established by the first paragraph of Section 10108 of the Public Contract Code shall be reviewed and approved by the chairperson, in consultation with the board.

(c) Money so transferred or deposited shall be available for expenditure by the department for the purposes for which appropriated, contributed, or made available, without regard to fiscal years and irrespective of the provisions of Sections 13340 and 16304 of the Government Code. Money transferred or deposited pursuant to this section shall be used only for purposes authorized in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 44.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2817.

The Inmate and Ward Construction Revolving Account is hereby created in the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund, established in Section 2806, to receive funds transferred or deposited for the purposes described in Section 2816.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 45.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

2818.

The New Industries Revolving Account is hereby created in the California Correctional Training and Rehabilitation Revolving Fund to receive General Fund or other public money transferred or deposited for the purpose of financing new enterprises or the expansion of existing enterprises. Money in the fund may be disbursed by the board subject to the conditions prescribed in Section 2810.5.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 241, Sec. 46.   (SB 857)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Sale of Prison Goods Made Outside California [2880. - 2891.]

2880.

To the extent and insofar as the same may be permitted under the provisions of the Constitution of the United States and the acts of Congress, all goods, wares, and merchandise manufactured, produced, or mined wholly or in part by prisoners (except prisoners on parole or probation) or manufactured, produced, or mined wholly or in part in any state prison, transported into the State of California and remaining herein for use, consumption, sale, or storage, shall upon arrival and delivery in this state be subject to the operation and effect of the laws of this state to the same extent and in the same manner as though those commodities had been manufactured, produced, or mined in this state by prisoners or in any state prison, and shall not be exempt therefrom by reason of being introduced in the original package or otherwise.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 125.)
-------------------------------------------

2881.

No person, firm, partnership, association or corporation within this State shall sell or offer, trade, consign, keep, expose or display for sale any goods, wares or merchandise manufactured, assembled, produced or mined in whole or in part by prisoners in any penitentiary, prison, reformatory or other establishment in which prison labor is employed, unless such prison-made goods, wares, or merchandise are plainly, legibly, conspicuously and indelibly branded, molded, embossed, stenciled or labeled with the words “Convict-made” in plain, bold letters followed by the name of such penitentiary, prison, reformatory or other establishment in which the goods, wares or merchandise were made.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2882.

It is hereby specifically provided that any article of prison-made goods, wares or merchandise, as described in the preceding section, may be labeled by the attachment of a label not smaller than four inches long and two inches wide, upon which is printed the words “Convict-made” in plain, bold letters followed by the name of such penitentiary, prison, reformatory, or other establishment in which the goods, wares or merchandise were made; provided, that in the judgment of officials charged with the enforcement of this article such prison-made goods, wares or merchandise can not be legibly, conspicuously and indelibly branded, molded, embossed, stenciled or labeled as provided in said preceding section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2883.

The size and type of such stenciling or label must be consistent with the size and character of the merchandise to which such stenciling or label applies. The size, type and character of such stenciling or label will be subject to the approval of the officials of the State of California responsible for the enforcement of this article.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2884.

No person, firm, partnership, association or corporation within this state shall sell or offer, trade, consign, keep, expose, or display for sale any goods, wares or merchandise manufactured, assembled, produced, or mined in whole or in part by prisoners in any penitentiary, prison, reformatory, or other establishment in which prison labor is employed, unless those prison-made goods, wares, or merchandise have first been disinfected or sterilized in a plant located in California and licensed by the State Department of Health Services in accordance with any regulations of the State Department of Health Services now in force or which later may be made effective.

It is hereby further provided that certificate of that disinfection or sterilization must accompany, be stamped on or attached to those goods, wares, or merchandise in a manner or form prescribed by the officials of the State of California responsible for the enforcement of this article.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 126.)
-------------------------------------------

2885.

No person, firm, partnership, association, or corporation within this State shall sell or offer, trade, consign, keep, expose or display for sale any goods, wares or merchandise manufactured, assembled, produced or mined in whole or in part by the prisoners in any penitentiary, prison, reformatory or other establishment in which prison labor is employed, unless such person, firm, partnership, association or corporation shall keep permanently and conspicuously displayed within the same inclosure and within 10 feet of the place where said prison-made goods, wares or merchandise are kept, exposed, displayed or offered for sale a suitable sign, at least 36 inches wide and 10 inches high, on which appear in legible letters not less than two inches high the following words: “Convict-made products on sale here.”

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2886.

Any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation within this State, when advertising in any periodical or publication any goods, wares or merchandise made in whole or in part by prisoners in any penitentiary, prison, reformatory or other establishment in which prison labor is employed, must insert the words “Convict-made,” in such advertisement in type or other letters conforming in size or shape to those used in the text of said periodical or publication.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2887.

Any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation violating the provisions of this article shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be punished by a fine of not less than fifty dollars ($50) or more than five hundred dollars ($500) for each offense, or by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days or more than six months or by both such fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2888.

The State Superintendent of Weights and Measures or any deputy or inspector authorized by him, shall have access to any premises or any records held by any person, firm, partnership, association or corporation containing any information pertaining to the prison-made goods, wares or merchandise referred to herein.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2889.

The enforcement of the provisions of this article shall be under the supervision of the State Superintendent of Weights and Measures.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2890.

The provisions of this article shall not apply to any goods, wares or merchandise manufactured in any penitentiary or prison of this State.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2891.

No person or corporation may sell, expose for sale or offer for sale any goods, wares or merchandise manufactured, produced or mined wholly or in part by prisoners (except prisoners on parole or probation) or manufactured, produced or mined wholly or in part in any State prison the sale of which is not specifically sanctioned by law; and any person or corporation violating any provision of this section is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Execution of Sentences of Imprisonment [2900. - 2981.]



  ARTICLE 1. Commencement of Term [2900. - 2905.]

2900.

(a) The term of imprisonment fixed by the judgment in a criminal action commences to run only upon the actual delivery of the defendant into the custody of the Director of Corrections at the place designated by the Director of Corrections as a place for the reception of persons convicted of felonies.

(b) Except as otherwise provided in this section, the place of reception shall be an institution under the jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections.

(1) As an emergency measure, the Director of Corrections may direct that persons convicted of felonies may be received and detained in jails or other facilities and that the judgment will commence to run upon the actual delivery of the defendant into such place and that any persons previously received and confined for conviction of a felony may be, as an emergency, temporarily housed at such place and the time during which such person is there shall be computed as a part of the term of judgment.

(2) In any case in which, pursuant to the agreement on detainers or other provision of law, a prisoner of another jurisdiction is, before completion of actual confinement in a penal or correctional institution of a jurisdiction other than the State of California, sentenced by a California court to a term of imprisonment for a violation of California law, and the judge of the California court orders that the California sentence shall run concurrently with the sentence which such person is already serving, the Director of Corrections shall designate the institution of the other jurisdiction as the place for reception of such person within the meaning of the preceding provisions of this section. He may also designate the place in California for reception of such person in the event that actual confinement under the prior sentence ends before the period of actual confinement required under the California sentence.

(3) In any case in which a person committed to the Director of Corrections is subsequently committed to a penal or correctional institution of another jurisdiction, the subsequent commitment is ordered to be served concurrently with the California commitment, the prisoner is placed in a penal or correctional institution of the other jurisdiction, and the prisoner is not received by the Director of Corrections pursuant to subdivision (a), the Director of Corrections shall designate the institution of the other jurisdiction as the place for reception and service of the California term.

(c) Except as provided in this section, all time served in an institution designated by the Director of Corrections shall be credited as service of the term of imprisonment.

(1) If a person is ordered released by a court from the custody and jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections pursuant to Section 1272 or 1506 or any other provision of law permitting the legal release of prisoners, time during which the person was released shall not be credited as service of the prison term.

(2) If a prisoner escapes from the custody and jurisdiction of the Director of Corrections, the prisoner shall be deemed an escapee and fugitive from justice, until the prisoner is available to return to the custody of the Director of Corrections or the State of California. Time during which the prisoner is an escapee shall not be credited as service of the prison term.

(d) The Department of Corrections may contract for the use of any facility of the state or political subdivision thereof to care for persons received in accordance with this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1987, Ch. 828, Sec. 127.)
-------------------------------------------

2900.1.

Where a defendant has served any portion of his sentence under a commitment based upon a judgment which judgment is subsequently declared invalid or which is modified during the term of imprisonment, such time shall be credited upon any subsequent sentence he may receive upon a new commitment for the same criminal act or acts.

(History: Added by Stats. 1949, Ch. 519.)
-------------------------------------------

2900.5.

(a) In all felony and misdemeanor convictions, either by plea or by verdict, when the defendant has been in custody, including, but not limited to, any time spent in a jail, camp, work furlough facility, halfway house, rehabilitation facility, hospital, prison, juvenile detention facility, or similar residential institution, all days of custody of the defendant, including days served as a condition of probation in compliance with a court order, credited to the period of confinement pursuant to Section 4019, and days served in home detention pursuant to Section 1203.016 or 1203.018, shall be credited upon his or her term of imprisonment, or credited to any
 base fine that may be imposed, at the rate of not less than one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per day, or more, in the discretion of the court imposing the sentence. If the total number of days in custody exceeds the number of days of the term of imprisonment to be imposed, the entire term of imprisonment shall be deemed to have been served. In any case where the court has imposed both a prison or jail term of imprisonment and a fine, any days to be credited to the defendant shall first be applied to the term of imprisonment imposed, and thereafter the remaining days, if any, shall be applied to the
 base fine. If an amount of the base fine is not satisfied by jail credits, or by community service, the penalties and assessments imposed on the base fine shall be reduced by the percentage of the base fine that was satisfied.

(b) For the purposes of this section, credit shall be given only where the custody to be credited is attributable to proceedings related to the same conduct for which the defendant has been convicted. Credit shall be given only once for a single period of custody attributable to multiple offenses for which a consecutive sentence is imposed.

(c) For the purposes of this section, “term of imprisonment” includes any period of imprisonment imposed as a condition of probation
 or otherwise ordered by a court in imposing or suspending the imposition of any sentence, and also includes any term of imprisonment, including any period of imprisonment prior to release on parole and any period of imprisonment and parole, prior to discharge, whether established or fixed by statute, by any court, or by any duly authorized administrative agency.

(d) It is the duty of the court imposing the sentence to determine the date or dates of any admission to, and release from, custody prior to sentencing and the total number of days to be credited pursuant to this section. The total number of days to be credited shall be contained in the abstract of judgment provided for in Section 1213.

(e) It is the duty of any agency to which a person is committed to apply the credit
 provided for in this section for the period between the date of sentencing and the date the person is delivered to the agency.

(f) If a defendant serves time in a camp, work furlough facility, halfway house, rehabilitation facility, hospital, juvenile detention facility, similar residential facility, or home detention program pursuant to Section 1203.016, 1203.017, or 1203.018, in lieu of
 imprisonment in a county jail, the time spent in these facilities or programs shall qualify as mandatory time in jail.

(g) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code as it pertains to the sentencing of convicted offenders, this section does not authorize the sentencing of convicted offenders to any of the facilities or programs mentioned herein.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 769, Sec. 2.   (AB 2839)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

2901.

It is hereby made the duty of the wardens of the State prisons to receive persons sentenced to imprisonment in a State prison, and such persons shall be imprisoned until duly released according to law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1941, Ch. 106.)
-------------------------------------------

2902.

All criminals sentenced to prison by the authority of the United States or of any state or territory of the United States, may be received by the Director of Corrections and imprisoned in California state prisons in accordance with the sentence of the court by which they were tried. The prisoners so confined shall be subject in all respects to discipline and treatment as though committed under the laws of this State and the Director of Corrections is authorized to enter into contracts with the proper agencies of the United States and of other states and territories of the United States with regard to the per diem rate such agencies shall pay to the State of California for the keep of each prisoner.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1949, Ch. 1590.)
-------------------------------------------

2903.

(a) In any case in which a woman offender can be sentenced to imprisonment in the county jail, or be required to serve a term of imprisonment therein as a condition of probation, or has already been so sentenced or imprisoned, the court which tried the offender may, with the consent of the offender and on application of the sheriff or on its own motion, with the consent of the offender, commit the offender to the sheriff with directions for placement in the California Institution for Women in lieu of placement in the county jail if the court finds that the local detention facilities are inadequate for the rehabilitation of the offenders and if the court concludes that the offender will benefit from that treatment and care as is available at that institution and the county has entered into a contract with the state under subdivision (b). The offenders may be received by the Director of Corrections and imprisoned in the California Institution for Women in accordance with the commitment of the court by which tried. The prisoners so confined shall be subject in all respects to discipline, diagnosis, and treatment as though committed under the laws of this state concerning felony prisoners.

(b) The Director of Corrections may enter into contracts, with the approval of the Director of General Services, with any county in this state, upon request of the board of supervisors thereof, wherein the Department of Corrections agrees to furnish diagnosis and treatment services and detention for selected women county prisoners. The county shall reimburse the state for the cost of the services, the cost to be determined by the Director of Finance. In any contract entered into pursuant to this subdivision, the county shall agree to pay that amount which is reasonably necessary for payment of an allowance to each released or paroled prisoner for transportation to the prisoner’s county of residence or county where employment is available, and may agree to provide suitable clothing and a cash gratuity to the prisoners in the event that they are discharged from that institution because of parole or completion of the term for which they were sentenced. Each county auditor shall include in his state settlement report rendered to the Controller in the months of January and June the amounts due under any contract authorized by this section, and the county treasurer, at the time of settlement with the state in those months, shall pay to the State Treasurer upon order of the Controller, the amounts found to be due.

(c) The Department of Corrections shall accept the women county prisoners if it believes that they can be materially benefited by the confinement, care, treatment and employment and if adequate facilities to provide the care are available. None of those persons shall be transported to any facility under the jurisdiction of the Department of Corrections until the director has notified the referring court that the person may be transported to the California Institution for Women and the time at which she can be received.

(d) The sheriff of the county in which an order is made placing a woman county prisoner pursuant to this section, or any other peace officer designated by the court, shall execute the order placing the person in the institution or returning her therefrom to the court. The expenses of the peace officer incurred in executing the order is a charge upon the county in which the court is situated.

(e) The Director of Corrections may return to the committing authority any woman prisoner transferred pursuant to this section when that person is guilty of any violation of rules and regulations of the California Institution for Women or the Department of Corrections.

(f) No woman prisoner placed in the California Institution for Women pursuant to this section shall thereafter be deemed to have been guilty of a felony solely by virtue of such placement, and she shall have the same rights to parole and to time off for good behavior as she would have had if she had been confined in the county jail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1981, Ch. 714, Sec. 335.)
-------------------------------------------

2905.

(a) For purposes of this section, a “youth offender” is an individual committed to the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation who is under 22 years of age.

(b) (1) The department shall, at reception, automatically grant a youth offender a lower security level than the level that corresponds with that individual’s classification score or placement in a facility that permits increased access to programs, except for a youth offender who has committed a serious in-custody offense, who shall be reviewed by a classification committee. The youth offender classification committee shall consist of the staff required by department regulations at any classification
 committee; however, at least one member shall be a department staff member specially trained in conducting the reviews. Training shall include, but not be limited to, adolescent and young adult development and evidence-based interviewing processes employing positive and motivational techniques.

(2) The purpose of the youth offender review is to meet with the youth offender and assess the readiness of a youth offender for a lower security level or placement permitting increased access to programs and to encourage the youth offender to commit to positive change and self-improvement.

(c) A youth offender shall be considered for placement at a lower security level than the level that corresponds with their classification score or placement in a facility that permits increased access
 to programs. When a classification committee is appropriate, it shall review factors including, but not limited to, the following:

(1) Recent in-custody behavior while housed in juvenile or adult facilities.

(2) Demonstrated efforts of progress toward self-improvement in juvenile or adult facilities.

(3) Family or community ties supportive of rehabilitation.

(4) Evidence of commitment to working toward self-improvement with a goal of being a law-abiding member of society upon release.

(d) For a youth offender requiring review by classification committee, if the department determines, based on the review described
 in subdivisions (b) and (c), that the youth offender may be appropriately placed at a lower security level, the department shall transfer the youth offender to a lower security level facility. If the youth offender is denied a lower security level, then they shall be considered for placement in a facility that permits increased access to programs. If the department determines a youth offender may appropriately be placed in a facility permitting increased access to programs, the youth offender shall be transferred to such a facility.

(e) For a youth offender requiring review by classification committee, if the youth offender demonstrates they are a safety risk to inmates, staff, or the public, and do not otherwise demonstrate a commitment to rehabilitation, the youth offender
 shall be reclassified and placed at a security level that is consistent with department regulations and procedures.

(f) A youth offender who at their initial youth offender classification committee review is denied a lower security level than the level that corresponds with their placement score or did not qualify for a placement permitting increased access to programs due to previous incarceration history and was placed in the highest security level shall nevertheless be eligible to have their placement reconsidered pursuant to subdivisions (b) to (d), inclusive, at their annual review until reaching 25 years of age. If at an annual review it is determined that the youth offender has had no serious rule violations for one year, the department shall consider whether the youth would benefit from placement in a lower level
 facility or
 placement permitting increased access to programs.

(g) The department shall review and, as necessary, revise existing regulations and adopt new regulations regarding classification determinations made pursuant to this section, and provide for training for staff.

(h) This section shall become operative on July 1, 2015.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 434, Sec. 13.   (SB 827)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 1.5. Transfer of Prisoners [2910. - 2913.]

2910.

(a) The Secretary of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation may enter into an agreement with a city, county, or city and county to permit transfer of prisoners in the custody of the secretary to a jail or other adult correctional facility of the city, county, or city and county, if the sheriff or corresponding official having jurisdiction over the facility has consented thereto. The agreement shall provide for contributions to the city, county, or city and county toward payment of costs incurred with reference to such transferred prisoners.

(b) When an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) is in effect with respect to a particular local facility, the secretary may transfer prisoners whose terms of
 imprisonment have been fixed and parole violators to the facility.

(c) Prisoners so transferred to a local facility may, with approval of the secretary, participate in programs of the facility, including, but not limited to, work furlough rehabilitation programs.

(d) Prisoners transferred to such facilities are subject to the rules and regulations of the facility in which they are confined, but remain under the legal custody of the Department of Corrections and Rehabilitation and shall be subject at any time, pursuant to the rules and regulations of the secretary, to be detained in the county jail upon the exercise of a state parole or correctional officer’s peace officer powers, as specified in Section 830.5, with the consent of the sheriff or corresponding official having jurisdiction over the facility.

(e) The
 secretary, to the extent possible, shall select city, county, or city and county facilities in areas where medical, food, and other support services are available from nearby existing prison facilities.

(f) The secretary, with the approval of the Department of General Services, may enter into an agreement to lease state property for a period not in excess of 20 years to be used as the site for a facility operated by a city, county, or city and county authorized by this section.

(g) An agreement shall not be entered into under this section unless the cost per inmate in the facility is no greater than the average costs of keeping an inmate in a comparable facility of the department, as determined by the secretary.

(h) This section shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Amended (as added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 310, Sec. 14) by Stats. 2016, Ch. 33, Sec. 20.   (SB 843)   Effective June 27, 2016.   Section operative January 1, 2020, by its own provisions.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.5.

(a) Pursuant to Section 2910, the Director of Corrections may enter into a long-term agreement not to exceed 20 years with a city, county, or city and county to place parole violators and other state inmates in a facility which is specially designed and built for the incarceration of parole violators and specified state prison inmates. 

(b) The agreement shall provide that persons providing security at the facilities shall be peace officers as defined in Sections 830.1 and 830.55 who have satisfactorily met the minimum selection and training standards prescribed by the Board of Corrections for local correctional personnel established under Section 6035. 

(c) A parole violator or other inmate may be confined in a facility established under this section. 

(1) If convicted within the last 10 years of a violent felony, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 667.5, or convicted of a crime, as defined in Sections 207, 210.5, 214, 217.1, or 220, or if that person has a history of escape or attempted escape, the Department of Corrections, prior to placing the parole violator or inmate in the facility, shall review each individual case to make certain that this placement is in keeping with the need to protect society. 

(2) No inmate or parole violator who has received a sentence of life imprisonment within the past 20 years shall be eligible. 

(3) The superintendent of the facility also shall review each individual case where the inmate or parolee has been convicted within the last 10 years of a crime specified in this subdivision and shall ascertain whether this is an appropriate placement. The superintendent shall reject those whom he or she determines are inappropriate due to their propensity for violence or escape and shall submit written findings for the rejection to the Department of Corrections. 

(4) No parole violator who receives a revocation sentence greater than 12 months shall be confined in a facility established under this section. 

(5) The Department of Corrections shall establish additional guidelines as to inmates eligible for the facilities. 

(d) In determining the reimbursement rate pursuant to an agreement entered into pursuant to subdivision (a), the director shall take into consideration the costs incurred by the city, county, or city and county for services and facilities provided and any other factors that are necessary and appropriate to fix the obligations, responsibilities, and rights of the respective parties. 

(e) Facilities operated by the county shall be under the supervision of the sheriff. Facilities operated by the city shall be under the supervision of a chief of police or a facility superintendent who shall have at least five years similar experience. 

(f) Cities or counties contracting with the Department of Corrections for a facility pursuant to this section shall be responsible for managing and maintaining the security of the facility pursuant to the regulations and direction of the Director of Corrections. No city or county may contract with any private provider to manage, operate, or maintain the security of the facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 1100, Sec. 4.)
-------------------------------------------

2910.6.

The Director of Corrections may enter into an agreement consistent with applicable law for a city, county, or city and county to construct and operate community corrections programs, restitution centers, halfway houses, work furlough programs, or other correctional programs authorized by state law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1987, Ch. 1450, Sec. 2.5.)
-------------------------------------------

2911.
